Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-437
Provisional license; when issued.

A provisional license may be issued to a health care facility or health care service that substantially complies with requirements for licensure under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act if the failure to fully comply with such requirements does not pose an imminent danger of death or physical harm to the persons residing in or served by such facility or service. Such provisional license shall be valid for a period of up to one year, shall not be renewed, and may be converted to a regular license upon a showing that the facility or service fully complies with the requirements for licensure under the act and rules and regulations.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 37.